Hawaii statutes.
§346-11 Unauthorized disclosure or
inspection. Any person, including any person acquiring information through
inspection permitted the person or another under section 346-10, who, knowing
the information to have been acquired from the confidential records or files of
the department of human services, intentionally divulges the same other than as
authorized by law, or who intentionally and knowingly aids or abets in the
inspection of such applications or records by any person unauthorized to
inspect the same under this chapter or other provisions of law, shall be guilty
of a violation. [L 1941, c 296, pt of §1; RL 1945, §4826; RL 1955, §108-6; HRS
§346-11; am L 1970, c 105, §5; am L 1978, c 105, §3; gen ch 1985; am L 1987, c
339, §4]

Case Notes

Confidentiality requirement insufficient to prevent
administrative inspection procedures from unconstitutionally intruding into
patient's freedom to decide whether to seek aid of psychiatrist and communicate
personal information. 481 F. Supp. 1028 (1979).

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next